Utah statutes.
41-3-203.   Licenses -- Form -- Seal -- Custody of salesperson's license --
Display of salesperson and dealer licenses -- Licensee's pocket card.
(1) (a)  The administrator shall prescribe the form of  each license and the
seal of his office shall be imprinted on each license.
(b)  The license of each salesperson shall be delivered or mailed to the
dealer employing the salesperson and it shall be kept in the custody and
control of the dealer and conspicuously displayed in the dealer's place of
business.
(c)  Each licensee shall display conspicuously his own license in his place of
business.
(2) (a)  The administrator shall prepare and deliver a pocket card, certifying
that the person whose name is on the card is licensed under this chapter.
(b)  Each salesperson's card shall also contain the name and address of the
dealer employing him.
(c)  Each salesperson shall on request display his pocket card.
